South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H3168.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Chapter 5, Title 47 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 47-5-65. Acting under the indirect supervision of a veterinarian, an employee, an agent, or a contractor of a county or municipal animal control authority may vaccinate against rabies dogs, cats, and ferrets in the custody of an animal control authority that will be transferred, rescued, fostered, adopted, or reclaimed by its owner. The supervising veterinarian assumes responsibility for any person vaccinating animals at his direction or under his direct or indirect supervision. As used in this section, the term "indirect supervision" means the supervising veterinarian is required to be available for consultation through telecommunications, but is not required to be physically present during the consultation. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----